California statutes. Public Utilities Code
 program enrollment and participation. This examination shall include, but need not be limited to, comparing information from the CARE program and the Universal Lifeline Telephone Service (ULTS) program to determine the most effective means of using that information to increase CARE program enrollment, automatic enrollment of ULTS program customers who are eligible for the CARE program, customer privacy issues, and alternative mechanisms for outreach to potential enrollees. The commission shall ensure that a customer consents before enrollment. The commission shall consult with interested parties, including ULTS program providers, to develop the best methods of informing ULTS program customers about other available low-income programs and the best mechanism for telephone providers to recover reasonable costs incurred pursuant to this section.

(f) (1) The commission shall improve the CARE program application process by cooperating with other entities and representatives of California government, including the California Health and Human Services Agency and the Secretary of California Health and Human Services, to ensure that all gas and electricity customers eligible for public assistance programs in California that reside within the service territory of an electrical corporation or gas corporation, are enrolled in the CARE program. The commission may determine that gas and electricity customers are categorically eligible for CARE program assistance if they are enrolled in other public assistance programs with substantially the same income eligibility requirements as the CARE program. To the extent practicable, the commission shall develop a CARE program application process using the existing ULTS program application
 process as a model. The commission shall work with electrical corporations, gas corporations, and the Low-Income Oversight Board established in Section 382.1 to meet the low-income objectives in this section.

(2) The commission shall ensure that an electrical corporation or gas corporation with a commission-approved program to provide discounts based on economic need in addition to the CARE program, including a Family Electric Rate Assistance program, uses a single application form, to enable an applicant to alternatively apply for any assistance program for which the applicant may be eligible. It is the intent of the Legislature to allow applicants under one program, who may not be eligible under that program, but who may be eligible under an alternative assistance program based on economic need, to complete a single application for any
 commission-approved assistance program offered by the public utility.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission ensure CARE program participants receive affordable electrical and gas service that does not impose an unfair economic burden on those participants.

(h) The CARE program shall, as soon as practicable, include nonprofit group living facilities specified by the commission, if the commission finds that the residents in these facilities substantially meet the commission’s low-income eligibility requirements and there is a feasible process for certifying that the assistance shall be used for the direct benefit, such as improved quality of care or improved food service, of the low-income residents in the facilities. The commission shall authorize electrical
 corporations and gas corporations to offer discounts to eligible facilities licensed or permitted by appropriate state or local agencies, and to facilities, including women’s shelters, hospices, and homeless shelters, that may not have a license or permit but provide other proof satisfactory to the electrical corporation or gas corporation that they are eligible to participate in the CARE program.

(i) The CARE program shall, as soon as practicable, include public housing authority owned or administered Homekey housing facilities, as described in Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code, where the residents of the facility substantially meet the CARE program’s income eligibility requirements, as determined by the commission, and the account is in the name of
 Homekey, a nonprofit funded by Homekey, or the public housing authority that owns or administers the facility. The commission shall authorize electrical corporations and gas corporations to offer discounts to those identified facilities and to establish feasible processes for certifying that the assistance is used for the direct benefit of the residents of those facilities.

(j) (1) In addition to existing assessments of eligibility, an electrical corporation may require proof of income eligibility for those CARE program participants whose electricity usage, in any monthly or other billing period, exceeds 400 percent of
 baseline usage. The authority of an electrical corporation to require proof of income eligibility is not limited by the means by which the CARE program participant enrolled in the program, including if the participant was automatically enrolled in the CARE program because of participation in a governmental assistance program. If a CARE program participant’s electricity usage exceeds 400 percent of baseline usage, the electrical corporation may require the CARE program participant to participate in the Energy Savings Assistance Program (ESAP), which includes a residential energy assessment, in order to provide the CARE program participant with information and assistance in reducing the CARE program participant’s energy usage. Continued participation in the CARE program may be conditioned upon the CARE program participant agreeing to participate in ESAP within 45 days of notice being given by
 the electrical corporation pursuant to this paragraph. The electrical corporation may require the CARE program participant to notify the electrical corporation of whether the residence is rented, and, if so, a means by which to contact the landlord, and the electrical corporation may share any evaluation and recommendation relative to the residential structure that is made as part of an energy assessment with the landlord of the CARE program participant. Requirements imposed pursuant to this paragraph shall be consistent with procedures adopted by the commission.

(2) If a CARE program participant’s electricity usage exceeds 600 percent of baseline usage, the electrical corporation shall require the CARE program participant to participate in ESAP, which includes a residential energy assessment, in order to provide the CARE program
 participant with information and assistance in reducing the CARE program participant’s energy usage. Continued participation in the CARE program shall be conditioned upon the CARE program participant agreeing to participate in ESAP within 45 days of a notice made by the electrical corporation pursuant to this paragraph. The electrical corporation may require the CARE program participant to notify the electrical corporation of whether
 the residence is rented, and, if so, a means by which to contact the landlord, and the electrical corporation may share any evaluation and recommendation relative to the residential structure that is made as part of an energy assessment with the landlord of the CARE program participant. Following the completion of the energy assessment, if the CARE program participant’s electricity usage continues to exceed 600 percent of baseline usage, the electrical corporation may remove the CARE program participant from the program if the removal is consistent with procedures adopted by the commission. This paragraph does not prevent a CARE program participant with electricity usage exceeding 600 percent of baseline usage from participating in an appeals process with the electrical corporation to determine whether the participant’s usage levels are legitimate.

(3) A CARE program participant in a rental residence shall not be removed from the program in situations where the landlord is nonresponsive when contacted by the electrical corporation or does not provide for ESAP participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 732, Sec. 1.   (AB 2672)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

739.2.

(a) The commission’s program of assistance to low-income electric and gas customers shall also include the following facilities, provided the commission finds that the occupants of the facilities substantially meet the commission’s low-income eligibility requirements and there is a feasible process for certifying that the assistance shall be used for the direct benefit of the occupants of the facilities:

(1) Migrant farmworker housing centers provided pursuant to Section 50710 of
 the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Employee housing, as defined in Section 17008 of the Health and Safety Code, that is licensed and inspected by state or local agencies pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Housing for agricultural employees, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1140.4 of the Labor Code, that has received an exemption from local property taxes pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) The assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall only apply to gas and electricity, or both, used for the housing occupied by the workers and employees specified in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 946, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

739.3.

(a) Subject to direction and supervision by the commission, each electrical corporation and gas corporation shall develop and implement a program of rate assistance to eligible food banks at a fixed percentage to be determined by the commission. The commission may adjust the fixed percentage as appropriate. The funding source for the rate assistance program is subject to the approval of the commission.

(b) The Legislature encourages the governing board of each local publicly owned electric utility to develop and implement a program of rate assistance to eligible food banks at a fixed percentage, to be determined by the governing board, but consistent with that fixed by the commission for electrical corporations.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Eligible food bank” means a qualified eligible recipient agency that has executed an agreement with the State Department of Social Services in order to participate in The Emergency Food Assistance Program administered by the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture. 

(2) “Eligible recipient agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 251.3(d) of Title 7 of the Code of
 Federal Regulations.

(3) “Agreement” means an agreement executed in compliance with Section 251.2 of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 581, Sec. 1.   (AB 2218)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

739.4.

(a) Any natural gas customer who enrolls in the CARE program after the effective date of this section, but before October 1, 2001, shall receive the same one-time bill credit based on the amount of each gas corporation’s average CARE customer discount applied for each month in October 2000 to March 2001, inclusive. The credit does not apply to a customer who initiates service with a gas corporation after the effective date of this section, and who has no prior history of service with the gas corporation. CARE program funds shall be used for the
 purpose of providing these credits. The commission shall adjust CARE program income requirements annually to reflect the increased cost-of-living due to inflation.

(b) The commission shall require all electrical and gas utilities through which CARE program rates are available to do all of the following, in multilingual formats to the extent printed and recorded information is provided, to facilitate better penetration rates for the CARE program and to protect low-income and senior households from unwarranted disconnection of necessary electric and gas services:

(1) Provide an outgoing message on all calls, where the customer is seeking to establish service or is put on hold, to customer service lines that briefly describes the CARE program in standard language approved by the commission, and that provides a toll-free phone number for customers to call to subscribe to the program
 or for further information.

(2) Provide information to customers about the CARE program and facilitate subscription to CARE, on all calls in which customers are making payment arrangements, on all collections calls, and on all calls for reconnection of service.

(3) (A) Provide information about the CARE program and other assistance programs, and attempt to qualify customers for CARE, and provide information about individual payment arrangements that allow customers to pay the amounts due over a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 12 months, and attempt to enroll customers in a payment arrangement program, before effecting any disconnection of service for nonpayment or inability to pay energy bills in full.

(B) (i) Offer individual payment arrangements to customers so
 that the customer is able to pay amounts due over a reasonable period of time, not to exceed 12 months.

(ii) Prohibit the disconnection of customers that have made, and are in compliance with, payment arrangements offered by an electric or gas utility pursuant to this subparagraph.

(C) Prohibit the disconnection of a delinquent residential customer for amounts due in which the electric or gas utility receives a commitment pledge, letter of intent, purchase order, or other notification that a provider of energy assistance is forwarding payment sufficient to prevent disconnection.

(D) (i) Advise residential customers facing disconnection or who contact the utility to make payment arrangements of the levelizing payment program that allows them to pay a monthly average bill based on 12 months
 usage.

(ii) Advise residential customers about enrollment in the levelizing payment program in conjunction with completion of payment arrangements, payment under terms of subparagraph (B), or at the customer’s request absent those arrangements.

(E) Nothing in this paragraph is intended to reduce the revenues of any utility extending payment arrangements subject to the terms of the paragraph.

(4) Provide information on customer bills, presented in a conspicuous manner on a front facing page, that indicates that a customer may be eligible for the CARE program. This notice shall be provided quarterly on customer bills.

(c) The commission shall conduct targeted outreach about the program using census block data to effectively target low-income and senior
 households throughout the state.

(d) CARE program funds shall be used for the purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) and outreach pursuant to subdivision (c). The commission’s costs for outreach pursuant to subdivision (c) may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) above the amount that the commission currently expends on similar activities related to the CARE program. Energy corporations may recover all reasonable costs from the CARE program funds of implementing this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   Effective May 22, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

739.5.

(a) The commission shall require that, whenever gas or electrical service, or both, is provided by a master-meter customer to users who are tenants of a mobilehome park, apartment building, or similar residential complex, the master-meter customer shall charge each user of the service at the same rate that would be applicable if the user were receiving gas or electricity, or both, directly from the gas corporation or load-serving entity, as defined in Section 380. The commission shall require a gas or electrical corporation furnishing service to the master-meter customer to establish uniform rates for master-meter service at a level that will provide a sufficient differential to cover the reasonable average costs to master-meter customers of providing submeter service, except that these costs shall not exceed the average cost
 that the gas or electrical corporation would have incurred in providing comparable services directly to the users of the service.

(b) (1) Every master-meter customer of a gas corporation or load-serving entity subject to subdivision (a) who, on or after January 1, 1978, receives any rebate from a load-serving entity or gas corporation shall distribute to, or credit to the account of, each current user served by the master-meter customer that portion of the rebate which the amount of gas or electricity, or both, consumed by the user during the last billing period bears to the total amount furnished by the load-serving entity or gas corporation to the master-meter customer during that period.

(2) Paragraph (1)
 includes the credits stemming from the revenues received by the electrical corporation as a result of the direct allocation of greenhouse gas allowances to electric utilities pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 95890 of Title 17 of the California Code of Regulations, that are required to be credited to customers of the electrical corporation pursuant to Section 748.5.

(c) An electrical or gas corporation furnishing service to a master-meter customer shall furnish to each user of the service within a submetered system every public safety customer service which it provides beyond the meter to its other residential customers. The corporation shall furnish a list of those services to the master-meter customer who shall post the list in a conspicuous place accessible to all users. Every corporation shall provide these public safety customer services to each user of electrical or gas service under a submetered system
 without additional charge unless the corporation has included the average cost of these services in the rate differential provided to the master-meter customer on January 1, 1984, in which case the commission shall deduct the average cost of providing these public safety customer services when approving rate differentials for master-meter customers.

(d) Every master-meter customer is responsible for maintenance and repair of its submeter facilities beyond the master-meter, and nothing in this section requires a load-serving entity or gas corporation to make repairs to or perform maintenance on the submeter system.

(e) Every master-meter customer shall provide an itemized billing of charges for electricity or gas, or both, to each individual user generally in accordance with the form and content of bills of the load-serving entity or gas corporation to its residential customers,
 including, but not limited to, the opening and closing readings for the meter, and the identification of all rates and quantities attributable to each block in the applicable rate structure. The master-meter customer shall also post, in a conspicuous place, the applicable specific current residential gas or electrical rate schedule, as published by the load-serving entity or gas corporation, or the load-serving entity’s or gas corporation’s internet website address of the specific current residential gas or electrical rate schedule. If the master-meter customer elects to post the internet website address where the schedule may be accessed, the master-meter customer shall also: (1) provide a copy of the specific current residential gas or electrical rate schedule, upon request, at no cost; and (2) state in the posting that an individual user may request a copy of the rate schedule from the master-meter customer.

(f) The commission shall require
 that every load-serving entity and gas corporation shall notify each master-meter customer of its responsibilities to its users under this section.

(g) The commission shall accept and respond to complaints concerning the requirements of this section that apply to a gas or electrical corporation through the consumer affairs branch, in addition to any other staff that the commission deems necessary to assist the complainant. In responding to the complaint, the commission shall consider the role that the office of the county sealer in the complainant’s county of residence may have in helping to resolve the complaint and, where appropriate, coordinate with that office.

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or decision of the commission, the commission shall not deny eligibility for the California Alternative Rates for Energy (CARE) program, created pursuant to Section 739.1,
 for a residential user of gas or electrical service who is a submetered resident or tenant served by a master-meter customer on the basis that some residential units in the master-meter customer’s mobilehome park, apartment building, or similar residential complex do not receive gas or electrical service through a submetered system.

(i) For purposes of this section, “rebate” does not include the award of a monetary incentive under the California Solar Initiative adopted by the Public Utilities Commission in Decision 05-12-044 and Decision 06-01-024, as modified by Article 1 (commencing with Section 2851) of Chapter 9 of Part 2, for a solar energy system that provides electrical generation to a mobilehome park.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 164, Sec. 1.   (SB 1117)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

739.6.

The commission shall establish rates using cost allocation principles that fairly and reasonably assign to different customer classes the costs of providing service to those customer classes, consistent with the policies of affordability and conservation. The cost allocation methodology adopted for gas corporations by the commission in Decisions 86-12-009 and 86-12-010, as supplemented by Decisions 87-05-046 and 87-12-039, is consistent with this policy, and shall be retained by the commission at least until December 31, 1990, except that the commission may modify this cost allocation methodology to address customer hardships and
 inequities if residential customers as a class are not, on balance, adversely affected and the purpose of the modification is not solely protection of gas corporation revenues. If any gas corporation files a cost allocation application seeking to change that methodology after May 1, 1990, the commission may not issue an order on that application until January 1, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 212, Sec. 3.   Effective June 28, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

739.7.

In establishing residential rates, the commission shall retain an appropriate inverted rate structure. If the commission increases baseline rates pursuant to Section 739, revenues resulting from those increases shall be used exclusively to reduce nonbaseline residential rates.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1040, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

739.8.

(a) Access to an adequate supply of healthful water is a basic necessity of human life, and shall be made available to all residents of California at an affordable cost.

(b) The commission shall consider and may implement programs to provide rate relief for low-income ratepayers.

(c) The commission shall consider and may implement programs to assist low-income ratepayers in order to provide appropriate incentives and
 capabilities to achieve water conservation goals.

(d) In establishing the feasibility of rate relief and conservation incentives for low-income ratepayers, the commission may take into account variations in water needs caused by geography, climate and the ability of communities to support these programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 549, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

739.9.

(a) “Fixed charge” means any fixed customer charge, basic service fee, demand differentiated basic service fee, demand charge, or other charge not based on the volume of electricity consumed.

(b) Increases to electrical rates and charges in rate design proceedings, including any reduction in the California Alternate Rates for Energy (CARE) discount, shall be reasonable and subject to a reasonable phase-in schedule relative to the rates and charges in effect before January 1, 2014.

(c) Consistent with the requirements of Section 739, the commission may modify the seasonal definitions and applicable percentage of average consumption for one or more climatic zones.

(d) The commission may adopt new, or expand existing, fixed charges for the purpose of collecting a reasonable portion of the fixed costs of providing electrical service to residential customers. The commission shall ensure that any approved charges do all of the following:

(1) Reasonably reflect an appropriate portion of the different costs of serving small and large customers.

(2) Not unreasonably impair incentives for conservation, energy efficiency, and beneficial electrification and greenhouse gas emissions reduction.

(3) Are set at levels that do not overburden low-income customers.

(e) (1) For the purposes of this section and Section 739.1, the commission may authorize fixed charges for any rate schedule applicable to a residential customer account. The fixed charge shall be established on an income-graduated basis with no fewer than three income thresholds so that a low-income ratepayer in each baseline territory would realize a lower average monthly bill without making any changes in usage. The commission shall, no later than July 1, 2024, authorize a fixed charge for default residential rates.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “income-graduated” means that low-income customers pay a smaller fixed charge than high-income customers.

(f) Notwithstanding the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 739 and Section 739.7, the commission shall not apply the composite tier method to the treatment of any revenues resulting from any fixed charge adopted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 10.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

739.10.

The commission shall ensure that errors in estimates of demand elasticity or sales do not result in material over or undercollections of the electrical corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 8, Sec. 10.   Effective April 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

739.11.

(a) For bills issued to customers of gas corporations and electrical corporations in which usage is estimated, it is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent practicable, the methodology for estimation be simple, transparent, and cost effective to the customer, and produce reasonably accurate results.

(b) For each gas corporation and electrical corporation that, for some portion of residential customers, employs every-other-month meter reading and estimates bills for months when the customer’s meter is not read, the commission shall direct the gas corporation or electrical corporation to include in its tariffs the methodology it employs to estimate bills for those months during which the meter is not
 read.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 467, Sec. 2.   (SB 711)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

739.12.

(a) The commission shall continue a program of assistance to residential customers of the state’s three largest electrical corporations consisting of households with total household annual gross income levels between 200 percent and 250 percent of the federal poverty guideline level. The program shall continue to be referred to as the Family Electric Rate Assistance or FERA program.

(b) The FERA program discount shall be an 18-percent line-item discount applied to an eligible customer’s bill calculated at the applicable
 rate for the billing period.

(c) The commission shall authorize the state’s three largest electrical corporations to increase or expand marketing and outreach efforts beyond those in effect as of December 31, 2018, to increase eligible customer participation in the FERA program.

(d) (1) The commission, by March 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, shall require the state’s three largest electrical corporations to report on their efforts to enroll customers in the FERA program.

(2) The commission, by June 1, 2025, and each year thereafter, shall review each electrical corporation’s report to ensure it has
 made reasonable efforts to enroll eligible households in the FERA program commensurate with the proportion of households the commission determines to be eligible within the electrical corporation’s service territory.

(3) If the commission, in its review of an electrical corporation’s report, determines the electrical corporation has not made reasonable efforts to enroll eligible households in the FERA program commensurate with the proportion of households the commission determines to be eligible within the electrical corporation’s service territory, the commission shall require the electrical corporation to develop a
 strategy and plan to sufficiently enroll eligible households within three years of the adoption of the strategy and plan.

(4) An electrical corporation may market enrollment for the FERA program separately from the CARE program and provide a separate FERA program-only application form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.   (SB 1130)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

739.13.

(a) The commission shall develop a definition of energy affordability.

(b) The definition of energy affordability shall establish energy affordability metrics based on household income and include the combined impact of electricity and gas bills.

(c) The commission shall use energy affordability metrics for both of the following purposes:

(1) To guide the development of any protections, incentives, discounts, or new programs to assist residential customers facing hardships or disconnections due to electricity or gas bills.

(2) To assess the impact of
 proposed rate increases on different types of residential customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 361, Sec. 7.   (SB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

739.15.

(a) The commission shall determine in a scoping ruling or other ruling whether an application from an electrical corporation or gas corporation requesting authorization for or recovery of capital expenditures requires the estimates described in subdivision (b).

(b) An application from an electrical corporation or gas corporation requesting authorization for or recovery of capital expenditures, including an application for conditional approval of the costs of an undergrounding plan pursuant to Section 8388.5, shall include, if the commission pursuant to subdivision (a) determines that the estimates are required, the electrical corporation’s or gas corporation’s best estimate of both of the following:

(1) The application’s impact on the electrical corporation’s or gas corporation’s annual revenue requirement for each year that the capital expenditures described in the application are expected to remain in the application’s rate base if the application is approved or conditionally approved.

(2) The net present value of the application’s impact on the electrical corporation’s or gas corporation’s annual revenue requirement provided pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) The commission shall require the electrical corporation or gas corporation to provide supporting workpapers and calculations for the estimates described in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   (AB 2847)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

740.

For purposes of setting the rates to be charged by every electrical corporation, gas corporation, heat corporation or telephone corporation for the services or commodities furnished by it, the commission may allow the inclusion of expenses for research and development.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

740.1.

The commission shall consider the following guidelines in evaluating the research, development, and demonstration programs proposed by electrical and gas corporations:

(a) Projects should offer a reasonable probability of providing benefits to ratepayers.

(b) Expenditures on projects which have a low probability for success should be minimized.

(c) Projects should be consistent with the corporation’s resource plan.

(d) Projects should not unnecessarily duplicate research currently, previously, or imminently undertaken by other electrical or gas corporations or research organizations.

(e) Each project should also support one or more of the following objectives:

(1) Environmental improvement.

(2) Public and employee safety.

(3) Conservation by efficient resource use or by reducing or shifting system load.

(4) Development of new resources and processes, particularly renewable resources and processes which further supply technologies.

(5) Improve operating efficiency and reliability or otherwise reduce operating
 costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1713, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

740.2.

The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, State Air Resources Board, electrical corporations, and the motor vehicle industry, shall evaluate policies to develop infrastructure sufficient to overcome any barriers to the widespread deployment and use of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles. By July 1, 2011, the commission shall adopt rules to address all of the following:

(a) The impacts upon electrical
 infrastructure, including infrastructure upgrades necessary for widespread use of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles and the role and development of public charging infrastructure.

(b) The impact of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles on grid stability and the integration of renewable energy resources.

(c) The technological advances that are needed to ensure the widespread use of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles and what role the state should take to support the development of this technology.

(d) The existing code and permit requirements that will impact the widespread use of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles and any recommended changes to existing legal impediments to the widespread use of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles.

(e) The role
 the state should take to ensure that technologies employed in plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles work in a harmonious manner and across service territories.

(f) The impact of widespread use of plug-in hybrid and electric vehicles on achieving the state’s goals pursuant to the California Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 and renewables portfolio standard program and what steps should be taken to address possibly shifting emissions reductions responsibilities from the transportation sector to the electrical industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.   (SB 626)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

740.3.

(a) The commission, in cooperation with the Energy Commission, the State Air Resources Board, air quality management districts and air pollution control districts, regulated electrical and gas corporations, and the motor vehicle industry, shall evaluate and implement policies to promote the development of equipment and infrastructure needed to facilitate the use of electricity and natural gas to fuel low-emission vehicles. Policies to be considered shall include both of the following:

(1) The sale-for-resale and the rate-basing of low-emission vehicles and supporting equipment such as batteries for electric vehicles and compressor stations for natural gas fueled vehicles.

(2) The development of
 statewide standards for electric vehicle charger connections and compressed natural gas vehicle fueling connections, including installation procedures and technical assistance to installers.

(b) The commission shall hold public hearings as part of its effort to evaluate and implement the new policies considered in subdivision (a).

(c) The commission’s policies authorizing utilities to develop equipment or infrastructure needed for electricity-powered and natural gas-fueled low-emission vehicles shall ensure that the costs and expenses of those programs are not passed through to electrical or gas ratepayers unless the commission finds and determines that those programs are in the ratepayers’ interest. The commission’s policies shall also ensure that utilities do not unfairly compete with nonutility enterprises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 27.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

740.4.

(a) The commission shall authorize public utilities to engage in programs to encourage economic development.

(b) Reasonable expenses for economic development programs, as specified in this section, shall be allowed, to the extent of ratepayer benefit, when setting rates to be charged by public utilities electing to initiate these programs. 

(c) Economic development activities may include, but not be limited to,
 the following:

(1) Community marketing and development. 

(2) Technical assistance to support technology transfer. 

(3) Market research. 

(4) Site inventories. 

(5) Industrial and commercial expansion and relocation assistance. 

(6) Business retention and recruitment. 

(7) Management assistance. 

(d) This section shall not be interpreted to permit the funding of economic development activities that benefit any affiliated companies or parent holding companies beyond that which is authorized by law as
 of January 1, 1992.

(e) (1) This section does not authorize the commission to establish discriminatory rates for the purpose of attracting or benefiting specific industries or business entities, except that incentives may be provided for the benefit of industries or business entities whose facilities are located within the boundaries of enterprise zones, economic incentive areas, recycling market development zones, or federal rural enterprise communities in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 12.8 (commencing with Section 7070) and Article 1 (commencing with Section 7080) of Chapter 12.9 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and Article 2 (commencing with Section 42145) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of the Public Resources Code.

(2) The commission may apply the incentives authorized by this subdivision that benefit industries or business entities
 whose facilities are located within the boundaries of economic enterprise zones or incentive areas to attract a federal Department of Defense Finance and Accounting Service Center at the existing site of Norton Air Force Base in San Bernardino County. This paragraph shall become inoperative if the federal Department of Defense Finance and Accounting Service Center is not located upon the premises known as Norton Air Force Base in San Bernardino County and shall also become inoperative on February 1, 1994, if that facility has not been awarded to that site before that date.

(f) The commission may provide incentives pursuant to subdivision (e) to industries or business entities whose facilities are located within the boundaries of an enterprise zone that engage in activities in connection with the conversion of Fort Ord to other uses.

(g) The commission may authorize rate discounts